Washington statutes.
RCW 9.16.030

Counterfeit mark—Intellectual property.

Any person who willfully and knowingly, and for financial gain, manufactures, uses, displays, advertises, distributes, offers for sale, sells or possesses with intent to sell or distribute any item, or offers any services, bearing or identified by a counterfeit mark, is guilty of the crime of counterfeiting.

Any state or federal certificate of registration of any intellectual property is prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the certificate.

[ 1999 c 322 s 2; 1909 c 249 s 344; Code 1881 s 854; 1873 p 194 s 63; 1854 p 85 s 87; RRS s 2596.]